South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3029.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 3, Title 20 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 20-3-132.  A payment of a spousal benefit from any federal agency must be used to offset any alimony to be paid by the payor spouse. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----